Tennessee, session 114, SB0883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-406(b), is amended by
deleting "four (4) business days" and substituting "five (5) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0883
002815
- 1 -